Yamls/V-dorjyny_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-25
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - дорйыны 'to defend'/ 'puolustaa'/ 'защищать': 
# Inf. suff. –ыны. Verb in –j, preceded by consonants: б, в, г, ж, к, м, п, р, ш, / Inf. suff. -ыны. Sanavartalon lopussa on –й, jonka edessä ovat konsonantit: б, в, г, ж, к, м, п, р, ш. 
     дорйыны+V+Inf: дорйыны
     дорйыны+V+Inf+PxSg2: дорйыныт
     дорйыны+V+Inf+Acc+PxSg2: дорйынытӧ
     дорйыны+V+Inf+PxSg3: дорйыныс
     дорйыны+V+Inf+Acc+PxSg3: дорйынысӧ 
     дорйыны+V+ConNeg+Pl: дорйӧ 
     дорйыны+V+ConNeg+Sg: дорйы
     дорйыны+V+Imprt+Sg2: [дорйы, дорйы-ко]
     дорйыны+V+Imprt+Pl1: [дорьям, дорьямӧ, дорьямӧ-ко, дорьямте, дорьямӧте]
     дорйыны+V+Imprt+Pl2: [дорйӧ, дорйӧ-ко, дорйӧте]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: дорья
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: дорьян
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: дорйӧ
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [дорьям, дорьямӧ]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [дорьят, дорьятӧ]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [дорйӧн, дорйӧны]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1: дорья
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2: дорьян
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3: дорьяс
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1: [дорьям, дорьямӧ]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2: [дорьят, дорьятӧ]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3: дорьясӧ
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: дорйи
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: дорйин
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: дорйис
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: [дорйим, дорйимӧ]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: [дорйит, дорйитӧ]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: дорйисӧ
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: [дорйӧмыт, дорйӧмат]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: [дорйӧм, дорйӧма]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: [дорйӧмныт, дорйӧмась]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: дорйӧмась
     дорйыны+V+Inf+Comp: дорйыныжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Comp: дорьяжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Comp: дорьянжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Comp: дорйӧжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Comp: [дорьямжык, дорьямӧжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Comp: [дорьятжык, дорьятӧжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Comp: [дорйӧнжык, дорйӧныжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Comp: дорьяжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Comp: дорьянжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Comp: дорьясжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Comp: [дорьямжык, дорьямӧжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Comp: [дорьятжык, дорьятӧжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Comp: дорьясӧжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Comp: дорйижык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Comp: дорйинжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Comp: дорйисжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Comp: [дорйимжык, дорйимӧжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Comp: [дорйитжык, дорйитӧжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Comp: дорйисӧжык
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Comp: [дорйӧмытжык, дорйӧматжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Comp: [дорйӧмжык, дорйӧмажык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Comp: [дорйӧмнытжык, дорйӧмасьжык]
     дорйыны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Comp: дорйӧмасьжык
    
     дорйыны+V+Der/ик+Ger+Compl: дорйик
     дорйыны+V+Der/ик+Ger+Ill: дорйикӧ
     дорйыны+V+Der/ик+Ger+Ill+PxSg1: дорйикам
     дорйыны+V+Der/ик+Ger+Ill+PxSg2: дорйикат
     дорйыны+V+Der/ик+Ger+Ill+PxSg3: дорйикас
     дорйыны+V+Der/ик+Ger+Ill+PxPl1: дорйиканым
     дорйыны+V+Der/ик+Ger+Ill+PxPl2: дорйиканыт
     дорйыны+V+Der/ик+Ger+Ill+PxPl3: дорйиканыс
     дорйыны+V+Der/ӧмӧн+Ger: дорйӧмӧн
     дорйыны+V+Der/ӧмӧн+Ger+Comp: дорйӧмӧнжык  
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger: дорйытӧдз
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg1: [дорйытӧдззам, дорйытӧдззим]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg2: [дорйытӧдззат, дорйытӧдззит]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg3: [дорйытӧдззас, дорйытӧдззис]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl1: [дорйытӧдззаным, дорйытӧдззиным]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl2: [дорйытӧдззаныт, дорйытӧдззиныт]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl3: [дорйытӧдззаныс, дорйытӧдззиныс]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger: дорйытӧн
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg1: [дорйытӧнням, дорйытӧнним]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg2: [дорйытӧннят, дорйытӧннит]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg3: [дорйытӧнняс, дорйытӧннис]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl1: [дорйытӧнняным, дорйытӧнниным]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl2: [дорйытӧнняныт, дорйытӧнниныт]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl3: [дорйытӧнняныс, дорйытӧнниныс]
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger: дорйытӧг
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg1: дорйытӧгьям
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg2: дорйытӧгьят
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg3: дорйытӧгьяс
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl1: дорйытӧгьяным
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl2: дорйытӧгьяныт
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl3: дорйытӧгьяныс
     
     дорйыны+V+Der/ӧм+PrfPrc+Sg: дорйӧм
     дорйыны+V+Der/ӧм+PrfPrc+Pl: дорйӧмӧсь
     дорйыны+V+Der/ись+Act+PrsPrc+Sg: дорйись
     дорйыны+V+Der/ись+Act+PrsPrc+Pl: дорйисьӧсь
     дорйыны+V+Der/ян+PrsPrc+Sg: дорьян
     дорйыны+V+Der/ян+PrsPrc+Pl: дорьянӧсь
     дорйыны+V+Der/яна+PrsPrc+Sg: дорьяна
     дорйыны+V+Der/яна+PrsPrc+Pl: дорьянаӧсь
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧм+PrivPrc+Sg: дорйытӧм
     дорйыны+V+Der/тӧм+PrivPrc+Pl: дорйытӧмӧсь
